District of Columbia statutes.
34-2202.02

Establishment of the District of Columbia Water and Sewer Authority; general purpose of the Authority.

(a)

There is established, as an independent authority of the District government, the District of Columbia Water and Sewer Authority. The Authority shall be a corporate body, created to effectuate certain public purposes, that has a separate legal existence within the District government.

(b)

Except as provided in §§ 34-2202.14 and 34-2202.15, the Authority shall be subject to all laws applicable to offices, agencies, departments, and instrumentalities of the District government, and shall be subject to the provisions of Chapter 2 of Title 1, including provisions granting oversight responsibilities to the Chief Financial Officer as defined in § 1-204.25(b).

(c)

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, the general purpose of the Authority is to plan, design, construct, operate, maintain, regulate, finance, repair, modernize, and improve water distribution and sewage collection, treatment, and disposal systems and services, and to encourage conservation.

History

Apr. 18, 1996, D.C. Law 11-111, § 202, 43 DCR 548
Sept. 18, 2007, D.C. Law 17-20, § 6062(a), 54 DCR 7052

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-204.53, § 1-204.90, § 2-223.01, § 8-105.71, § 34-2202.01, and § 42-3251.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 43-1672.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 17-20, in subsec. (b), inserted “,including provisions granting oversight responsibilities to the Chief Financial Officer as defined in § 1-204.25(b)”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 6062(a) of Fiscal Year 2008 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-74, July 25, 2007, 54 DCR 7549).

Short Title

Short title: Section 6061 of D.C. Law 17-20 provided that subtitle G of title VI of the act may be cited as the “Water and Sewer Authority Clarification of Authorities and Report Requirement Amendment Act of 2007”.

Mayor's Orders

Establishment of the Executive Transition Team for the District of Columbia Water and Sewer Authority: See Mayor’s Order 96-43, March 27, 1996 ( 43 DCR 1807).